Hawaii statutes.
[MANPOWER
DEVELOPMENT AND TRAINING]

[§202-21 Participation in federal program.]
The department of labor and industrial relations and the University of Hawaii
are authorized to participate in the Manpower Development and Training Act of
1962, as amended, by providing from funds appropriated by the legislature for
such purpose, in accordance with and to the extent required by the federal act,
amounts necessary to match the amounts expended by the United States Treasury.
[L 1964, c 11, §2; am L 1965, c 23, §1; am L 1968, c 71, §5; HRS §202-21]

Cross References

Establishment of manpower development and training programs,
see chapter 394.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next